Lecture5/esperanto.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+Verb +Cont +Pres +Past +Fut +Cond +Inf +Subj +Guess ^GUESSVERBROOT

LEXICON Root
                Vroot ;

LEXICON Vroot
dir             V ; ! say
don             V ; ! give
est             V ; ! be
ir              V ; ! go
pens            V ; ! think
^GUESSVERBROOT  V ; ! <- placeholder
                    ! for any other verbs

LEXICON V
+Verb:0         AD ;

LEXICON AD
+Cont:ad        Vend ; ! continuous aspect
                Vend ;

LEXICON Vend
+Pres:as        # ; ! present
+Past:is        # ; ! past
+Fut:os         # ; ! future
+Cond:us        # ; ! conditional
+Inf:i          # ; ! infinitive
+Subj:u         # ; ! subjunctive

END
